New York, session 2025-2026, S1045.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of section 353 of the agriculture and 2 markets law, as amended by chapter 523 of the laws of 2005, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 A person who overdrives, overloads, tortures or cruelly beats or 5 unjustifiably injures, maims, mutilates or kills any animal, whether 6 wild or tame, and whether belonging to [himself] such person or to 7 another, or deprives any animal, other than a companion animal, of 8 necessary sustenance, food or drink, or neglects or refuses to furnish 9 it such sustenance or drink, or causes, procures or permits any animal 10 to be overdriven, overloaded, tortured, cruelly beaten, or unjustifiably 11 injured, maimed, mutilated or killed, or, being any animal other than a 12 companion animal, to be deprived of necessary food or drink, or who 13 wilfully sets on foot, instigates, engages in, or in any way furthers 14 any act of cruelty to any animal, or any act tending to produce such 15 cruelty, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor and for purposes of para- 16 graph (b) of subdivision one of section 160.10 of the criminal procedure 17 law, shall be treated as a misdemeanor defined in the penal law. 18 § 2. Section 353-b of the agriculture and markets law, as added by 19 chapter 594 of the laws of 2003, is amended to read as follows: 20 § 353-b. Appropriate shelter for [dogs] companion animals left 21 outdoors. 1. For purposes of this section: 22 (a) "Physical condition" shall include any special medical needs of a 23 dog due to disease, illness, injury, age or breed about which the owner 24 or person with custody or control of [the dog] a companion animal should 25 reasonably be aware. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02739-01-5 S. 1045 2 1 (b) "Inclement weather" shall mean weather conditions that are likely 2 to adversely affect the health or safety of [the dog] a companion 3 animal, including but not limited to rain, sleet, ice, snow, wind, or 4 extreme heat and cold. 5 (c) "[Dogs] Companion animals that are left outdoors" shall mean 6 [dogs] companion animals that are outdoors in inclement weather without 7 ready access to, or the ability to enter, a house, apartment building, 8 office building, or any other permanent structure that complies with the 9 standards enumerated in paragraph (b) of subdivision three of this 10 section. 11 2. (a) Any person who owns or has custody or control of a [dog] 12 companion animal that is left outdoors shall provide it with shelter 13 appropriate to its breed, physical condition and the climate. Any person 14 who knowingly violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of 15 a [violation] felony, punishable by a fine of not [less than fifty 16 dollars nor] more than [one hundred] five thousand dollars [for a first 17 offense, and a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than 18 two hundred fifty dollars for a second and subsequent offenses], or 19 imprisonment for not more than two years, or both such fine and impri- 20 sonment. Beginning seventy-two hours after a charge of violating this 21 section, each day that a defendant fails to correct the deficiencies in 22 the [dog] shelter for a [dog] companion animal that [he or she] the 23 defendant owns or that is in [his or her] the defendant's custody or 24 control and that is left outdoors, so as to bring it into compliance 25 with the provisions of this section shall constitute a separate offense. 26 (b) [The court may, in its discretion, reduce the amount of any fine 27 imposed for a violation of this section by the amount which the defend- 28 ant proves he or she has spent providing a dog shelter or repairing an 29 existing dog shelter so that it complies with the requirements of this 30 section.] Nothing in this paragraph shall prevent the seizure of a [dog] 31 companion animal for a violation of this section pursuant to the author- 32 ity granted in this article. 33 3. Minimum standards for determining whether shelter is appropriate to 34 a [dog's] companion animal's breed, physical condition and the climate 35 shall include: 36 (a) For [dogs] companion animals that are restrained in any manner 37 outdoors, shade by natural or artificial means to protect the [dog] 38 companion animal from direct sunlight at all times when exposure to 39 sunlight is likely to threaten the health of the [dog] companion animal. 40 (b) For all [dogs] companion animals that are left outdoors in incle- 41 ment weather, a housing facility, which must: (1) have a waterproof 42 roof; (2) be structurally sound [with] so as to protect the companion 43 animal from the inclement weather; (3) be appropriate for the companion 44 animal's breed and physical condition, and the climate; (4) have insu- 45 lation appropriate to local climatic conditions and sufficient to 46 protect the [dog] companion animal from inclement weather; [(3)] (5) 47 have four connected sides and a raised floor; (6) have a door maintained 48 in good repair, that is offset and baffled, if necessary, to eliminate 49 the entry of drafts and precipitation, and also allow the accumulation 50 of body heat; provided, further, that damaged door flaps shall be 51 replaced; (7) be constructed to allow each [dog] companion animal 52 adequate freedom of movement to make normal postural adjustments, 53 including the ability to stand up, turn around and lie down with its 54 limbs outstretched; and [(4)] (8) allow for effective removal of excre- 55 tions, other waste material[;], dirt and trash. The housing facility and S. 1045 3 1 the area immediately surrounding it shall be regularly cleaned to main- 2 tain a healthy and sanitary environment and to minimize health hazards. 3 (c) For companion animals that are restrained in any manner outdoors 4 in an enclosure, such enclosure shall be set on a solid foundation, such 5 as stone or concrete, or solid ground that is well drained. 6 (d) For companion animals that are restrained in any enclosure, wheth- 7 er indoors or outdoors, the animal shall be provided with dry bedding 8 and/or solid resting boards so as to conserve its body heat, and under 9 no circumstance shall a companion animal be forced to lie on a damp 10 surface or upon unheated concrete or stone. 11 4. Inadequate shelter may be indicated by the appearance of the hous- 12 ing facility itself, including but not limited to, size, structural 13 soundness, evidence of crowding within the housing facility, healthful 14 environment in the area immediately surrounding such facility, or by the 15 appearance or physical condition of the [dog] companion animal. 16 5. Upon a finding of any violation of this section, any [dog or dogs] 17 companion animal or companion animals seized pursuant to the provisions 18 of this article that have not been voluntarily surrendered by the owner 19 or custodian or forfeited pursuant to court order shall be returned to 20 the owner or custodian only upon proof that appropriate shelter as 21 required by this section is being provided and the completion of any 22 sentence of imprisonment imposed for violation of this section. 23 6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any 24 protections afforded to [dogs] companion animals or other animals under 25 any other provisions of this article. 26 § 3. The agriculture and markets law is amended by adding a new 27 section 353-g to read as follows: 28 § 353-g. Failure to provide proper food and drink to a companion 29 animal. Any person who, having ownership, custody or control of a 30 companion animal, refuses or neglects to supply such animal a sufficient 31 supply of food or water so as to impair the health of the companion 32 animal shall be guilty of a felony, punishable by a fine of not more 33 than five thousand dollars, or imprisonment for not more than two years, 34 or both such fine and imprisonment. 35 § 4. Section 356 of the agriculture and markets law, as amended by 36 chapter 458 of the laws of 1985, is amended to read as follows: 37 § 356. Failure to provide proper food and drink to impounded animal. A 38 person who, having impounded or confined any animal, other than a 39 companion animal, refuses or neglects to supply to such animal during 40 its confinement a sufficient supply of good and wholesome air, food, 41 shelter and water, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprison- 42 ment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than one thou- 43 sand dollars, or by both. In case any animal, including a companion 44 animal, shall be at any time impounded as aforesaid, and shall continue 45 to be without necessary food and water for more than twelve successive 46 hours, it shall be lawful for any person, from time to time, and as 47 often as it shall be necessary, to enter into and upon any pound in 48 which any such animal shall be so confined, and to supply it with neces- 49 sary food and water, so long as it shall remain so confined; such person 50 shall not be liable to any action for such entry, and the reasonable 51 cost of such food and water may be collected by [him of] such person 52 from the owner of such animal, and the said animal shall not be exempt 53 from levy and sale upon execution issued upon a judgment therefor. 54 § 5. This act shall take effect on the first of September next 55 succeeding the date on which it shall have become a law.